Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-103
Arthur.

The county of Arthur is bounded as follows: Commencing at the southeast corner of township seventeen, north, range thirty-six, west of the sixth principal meridian; thence north on the range line between ranges thirty-five and thirty-six to the northeast corner of township twenty, north, range thirty-six, west; thence west along the fifth standard parallel to the northwest corner of township twenty, north, range forty, west; thence south along the range line between ranges forty and forty-one, west, to the southwest corner of township seventeen, north, range forty, west; thence east along the fourth standard parallel to the place of beginning.

Laws 1887, c. 21, § 1, p. 344;

Laws 1895, c. 23, § 1, p. 124;

R.S.1913, § 815;

Laws 1921, c. 231, § 1, p. 822;

C.S.1922, § 717;

Laws 1925, c. 155, § 1, p. 393;

C.S.1929, § 25-104;

R.S.1943, § 22-103.

Act of 1913, making provision for organization of Arthur County, is not unconstitutional. State ex rel. Martin v. Hawkins, 95 Neb. 740, 146 N.W. 1044 (1914).

Arthur County, until organized, was attached to McPherson. Robinson v. State, 71 Neb. 142, 98 N.W. 694 (1904).